Washington statutes.
RCW 4.80.010

Exception defined.

An exception is a claim of error in a ruling or decision of a court, judge or other tribunal, or officer exercising judicial functions, made in the course of an action or proceeding or after judgment therein.

[ 1893 c 60 s 1; RRS s 381.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 46.

Construction—1893 c 60: "This act shall govern proceedings had after it shall take effect, in actions then pending as well as those in actions thereafter begun; but it shall not affect any right acquired or proceeding had prior to the time when it shall take effect, nor restore any right or enlarge any time then already lost or expired. And except as above provided all acts and parts of acts inconsistent with the provisions of this act are hereby repealed." [ 1893 c 60 s 18.] This applies to RCW 4.80.010 through 4.80.140.